Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
CHAPTER 277 Railroads — Organization and Operating Regulations
277.402.
Preservation of railroad corridors — Public policy — Preliminary declaration of state railbanking.

It is the public policy of this state to preserve railroad corridors for future railroad use. Toward this end, the Commonwealth recognizes that the salvage of tracks, ties, signaling equipment, ballast, and other items may indicate an intent to maximize return on present investment and not an intent to abandon any underlying easement for railroad or other use and that the obtaining of federal authority to discontinue service over or abandon a corridor does not necessarily indicate an intent to relinquish any property interests under state law. In any civil action to determine the status of a railroad use easement, ambiguity as to intent shall be resolved in favor of continued preservation of the corridor.

Any holder of a railroad corridor held by easement or otherwise may preserve that corridor by filing with the Secretary of State a “Preliminary Declaration of State Railbanking,” concurrently serving a copy of the declaration on the Transportation Cabinet. The declaration shall state the name of the entity holding the corridor, a textual description and map of the land area encompassed by the corridor, and a statement that the entity does not intend to abandon the corridor described in the declaration. The entity filing the declaration may at any later time cause that declaration to be withdrawn from the Secretary of State’s files. While a preliminary declaration of state railbanking is on file with the Secretary of State, the corridor set out in the declaration shall not, regardless of the status or conclusion of any federal regulatory proceeding or the salvage of track and other material from the corridor, be deemed abandoned and shall continue to exist under Kentucky law and the property encompassed by the corridor shall not revert to any other form of ownership.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 338, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

277.404.
Conservation easement under KRS 382.800 to 382.860 over land adjoining or traversed by a railtrail.

In addition to any other legal right, any person having a legal interest in land adjoining a railtrail or in the land traversed by the railtrail itself may grant to the entity holding the right to maintain a railtrail over the property a conservation easement over all or a portion of the property in accordance with KRS

382.800

to

382.860

. The entity holding the right to maintain a railtrail over the corridor may, if it finds the easement’s terms acceptable, yearly designate for the tax purposes of the party conveying the easement that the entity is holding the corridor pursuant to the authority granted to that entity in the easement as opposed to authority granted in KRS

277.400

or any similar law allowing railbanking under federal law. This designation shall not, however, affect in any way the legal right of that entity to hold the corridor pursuant to a federal or state railbanking law or the operation of those laws, and the right to maintain the railtrail on the land shall not lapse as the result of the extinguishment or modification of the easement. The easement, by its terms, may be limited in duration from year to year or for a set period of years, may extinguish itself upon the happening of a defined contingent future event, or may last in perpetuity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 338, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

277.406.
Duty of railroad proposing to discontinue service or to abandon railroad corridor to notify Railtrail Development Office and Department of Parks.

Each railroad proposing to discontinue service over or to obtain federal authority for regulatory abandonment of a railroad corridor in the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall, in addition to those notification requirements set out in federal law, notify the Commonwealth’s Railtrail Development Office in the Department for Local Government and the trails coordinator in the Department of Parks that the railroad is attempting to obtain federal authority to do so.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 338, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 92, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 87, effective July 15, 2010.

277.410.
Human trafficking hotline telephone number to be prominently displayed in each passenger train station’s restrooms.

Every passenger train station shall post in all of its restrooms a printed sign in English and Spanish at least eleven (11) inches by fourteen (14) inches in size, with letters at least one (1) inch high, displaying the current telephone hotline number of the National Human Trafficking Resource Center or any federally funded successor entity. The sign shall be:

Created using gender-neutral language supplied by the Office of the Attorney General; and

Posted in a prominent place easily seen by patrons.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 75, § 4, effective July 15, 2020.

277.990.
Penalties.

Any railroad company that violates or permits any of its agents or employees to violate any of the provisions of KRS

277.110

, subsection (1) of

277.160

,

277.170

,

277.180

,

277.210

,

277.230

or

277.300

shall, in addition to subjecting itself to any damages that may be caused by such violation, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense, to be recovered in the Franklin Circuit Court or in the circuit court of any county through which the railroad operates a line of road.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (2) of KRS

277.160

shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Any railroad company that violates, or permits any of its agents or employees to violate, any of the provisions of KRS

277.190

, shall, in addition to subjecting itself to liability for any damage caused thereby, be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense. Prosecutions under this subsection shall not be commenced after six (6) months from the commission of the offense charged in the prosecution.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

277.250

shall be fined fifty dollars ($50) or imprisoned for thirty (30) days, or both.

Any owner or operator of a railroad running through or within this state as a common carrier of persons or property or both, for compensation, who either operates for its employees, or who furnishes to its employees for their transportation to or from the place or places where they are required to labor, a rail track motor car that has not been fully equipped as required by KRS

277.245

, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense and each day or part of a day it operates or furnishes each of such rail track motor cars not so equipped as provided in KRS

277.245

to its employees for operation to or from the place or places where they are required to work shall constitute a separate offense.

Any railroad company that violates the provisions of KRS

277.200

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. If a grade crossing or drawbridge is obstructed by two (2) or more trains stopping and standing thereon in succession without allowing accumulated highway or water traffic to pass, the obstruction by each such successive train shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

773a-2, 786, 793, 805, 806, 842: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 90; 1964, ch. 158, § 16; 1970, ch. 201, § 2; 2000, ch. 417, § 15, effective December 1, 2000, upon contingency.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(12/1/2000). The contingency on the effectiveness of this statute set by
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 417, sec. 18, was met, the voters of the Commonwealth having ratified at the general election on November 7, 2000, a constitutional amendment (see
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 399) abolishing the Railroad Commission.